Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 396, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 32, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 396), is amended to read as follows:
Section 396. There is hereby re-created, to continue until July
1, 2024 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the Oklahoma Funeral Board. Any reference in the
statutes to the Oklahoma State Board of Embalmers and Funeral
Directors shall be a reference to the Oklahoma Funeral Board. The
Board shall consist of seven (7) persons, who shall be appointed by
the Governor. The term of membership of each member of the Board
shall be five (5) years from the expiration of the term of the
member succeeded. Any member having served as a member of the Board
shall be eligible for reappointment. Provided that, a member of the
Board shall serve no more than two consecutive terms and any
unexpired term that a member is appointed to shall not apply to this
limit. The Governor shall appoint the necessary members to the
Board upon vacancies and immediately prior to the expiration of the
various terms. Upon request of the Governor, appointments of a
licensed embalmer and funeral director member of the Board shall be
made from a list of five qualified persons submitted by the Oklahoma

Funeral Directors Association. An appointment to fill a vacancy
shall be for the unexpired term. A member of the Board shall serve
until a successor is appointed and qualified. No person shall be a
member of the Board, unless, at the time of appointment, the person
is of good moral character and a resident of this state. Five of
the members shall have been actively engaged in the practice of
embalming and funeral directing in this state for not less than
seven (7) consecutive years immediately prior to the appointment of
the person, shall have an active license as provided by the Funeral
Services Licensing Act, shall keep the license effective, and remain
a resident of this state during the entire time the person serves on
the Board. Two of the members of the Board shall be chosen from the
general public, one of whom shall, if possible, be a person licensed
and actively engaged in the health care field, and shall not be
licensed funeral directors or embalmers or have any interest,
directly or indirectly, in any funeral establishment or any business
dealing in funeral services, supplies or equipment. These two
members shall be appointed to serve for five-year terms.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1029 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of February,
2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1029 Page 3